Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF4429.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 354.05, subdivision 37, is amended to read: Subd. 37. Termination of teaching service. "Termination of teaching service" means the withdrawal of a member from active teaching service by resignation or the termination of the member's teaching contract by the employer. A member is not considered to have terminated teaching service, if before the age of deleted text begin 62deleted text end new text begin 59-1/2new text end , and before the effective date of the termination or retirement, the member has entered into a contract to resume teaching service with an employing unit covered by the provisions of this chapter. A contract to return to work after retirement for an active member who has attained age deleted text begin 62deleted text end new text begin 59-1/2new text end must comply with the provisions of section 354.444. Sec. 2. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 354.444, subdivision 2, is amended to read: Subd. 2. Eligibility. An eligible person is a person who: (1) is a teacher as defined by section 354.05, subdivision 2, who is at least age deleted text begin 62deleted text end new text begin 59-1/2new text end ; (2) enters into a written agreement with the employing unit to return to work; and (3) retires under the provisions of section 354.44 and begins to draw an annuity from the Teachers Retirement Association. Sec. 3. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 354.444, subdivision 3, is amended to read: Subd. 3. Work agreement. new text begin (a) A member who is at least age 59-1/2 may, before the effective date of retirement, enter into a written agreement to return to work with an employing unit covered by the provisions of this chapter. new text end new text begin (b) new text end Participation, the amount of time worked, and the duration of participation under this section must be mutually agreed upon by the employing unit and the employee. The employing unit may require up to a one-year notice of intent to participate in the program as a condition of participation. The employing unit shall determine the time of year the employee shall work. Unless otherwise specified in this section, the employing unit may not require a person to waive any rights under a collective bargaining agreement as a condition of participation under this section. Sec. 4. Laws 2022, chapter 65, article 3, section 1, subdivision 2, as amended by Laws 2024, chapter 102, article 1, section 8, is amended to read: Subd. 2. Temporary suspension of earnings limitation for teachers covered by TRA and SPTRFA. (a) Notwithstanding Minnesota Statutes, section 354.44, subdivision 5, no portion of a reemployed teacher's annuity paid under Minnesota Statutes, chapter 354, shall be deferred regardless of the amount of the salary earned from the teaching service during the preceding fiscal year. This paragraph applies only to salary earned during fiscal years deleted text begin 2022, 2023, 2024,deleted text end 2025, 2026, deleted text begin anddeleted text end 2027new text begin , 2028, 2029, and 2030new text end and annuity payments made during calendar years deleted text begin 2023, 2024, 2025,deleted text end 2026, 2027, deleted text begin anddeleted text end 2028new text begin , 2029, 2030, and 2031new text end . (b) Notwithstanding Minnesota Statutes, section 354A.31, subdivision 3, no portion of a reemployed teacher's annuity paid under Minnesota Statutes, chapter 354A, shall be deferred or forfeited regardless of the amount of the salary earned from the teaching service during the preceding calendar year. This paragraph applies only to salary earned during calendar years deleted text begin 2022, 2023, 2024,deleted text end 2025, 2026, deleted text begin anddeleted text end 2027new text begin , 2028, 2029, and 2030new text end and annuity payments made during calendar years deleted text begin 2023, 2024, 2025,deleted text end 2026, 2027, deleted text begin anddeleted text end 2028new text begin , 2029, 2030, and 2031new text end . Sec. 5. Laws 2022, chapter 65, article 3, section 1, subdivision 3, as amended by Laws 2024, chapter 102, article 1, section 9, is amended to read: Subd. 3. Expiration date. This section expires effective January 1, deleted text begin 2029deleted text end new text begin 2032new text end . Sec. 6. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE.new text end new text begin Sections 1 to 5 are effective the day following final enactment. new text end